Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.480

Violations resulting in improper or nonpayment—Charges.

When a violation has occurred which results in improper payment or nonpayment and a claim is made to the department and the payment is secured through the actions of the department, the charges made to the consignor for the action of the department in the matter will depend upon the delay of reporting after such improper payment or nonpayment would normally become obvious to the consignor as follows:

(1) When reported within thirty days, no charge.

(2) When reported thirty days to one hundred eighty days, five percent.

(3) When reported after one hundred eighty days, ten percent.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 14.]